Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB482.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 438 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Hemp-derived vapor product" means a vapor product containing delta-8
tetrahydrocannabinol or delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol that is derived from
hemp, as defined in KRS 260.850;
(b) "Retailer" means any person who sells hemp-derived vapor products to a
consumer for any purpose other than resale; and
(c) 1. "Vapor product" means any noncombustible product that employs a
heating element, battery, power source, electronic circuit, or other
electronic, chemical, or mechanical means, regardless of shape or size
and including the component parts and accessories thereto, that can
be used to deliver vaporized hemp or other substances to users
inhaling from the device.
2. "Vapor product" includes but is not limited to vape pens, disposable
vapes, pod systems, pod mods, or similar products or devices and every
variation thereof, regardless of whether marketed as such, and any
vapor cartridge or other container of a liquid solution or other
material that is intended to be used with or in vape pens, disposable
vapes, pod systems, pod mods, or other similar products or devices.
(2) (a) A retailer shall notify a consumer placing an order for any hemp-derived
vapor product that the shipment or delivery shall not be completed unless
the recipient of the shipment or delivery provides a valid identification
document at the time of the shipment or delivery verifying that the recipient
is at least twenty-one (21) years of age.
Page 1 of 3
BR184100.100 - 1841 - XXXX 1/23/2026 10:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1841
(b) All hemp-derived vapor product containers shipped or delivered to a
consumer shall be conspicuously labeled with the words: "CONTAINS
HEMP-DERIVED VAPOR PRODUCTS: SIGNATURE OF PERSON AGE
21 OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY".
(3) At the time of delivery, the recipient of the shipment or delivery shall present to
the individual delivering the package a valid identification document. Prior to
transferring possession of the package, the individual delivering the package
shall visually inspect the document and verify the identity of the recipient and, by
visual examination or by using age verification technology, that the recipient is at
least twenty-one (21) years of age.
(4) Before transferring possession of the package, the individual delivering the
package shall obtain the signature of the recipient of the shipment or delivery.
The individual who receives and signs for the hemp-derived vapor product is not
required to be the consumer who purchased the hemp-derived vapor product.
(5) A retailer or common or private carrier that fails to comply with this section
shall:
(a) For the first offense, be guilty of a violation punishable by a fine of one
thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500); and
(b) For each subsequent offense, be guilty of a violation punishable by a fine of
three thousand dollars ($3,000).
(6) (a) A consumer who intentionally causes an unlawful shipment or delivery
under this section shall:
1. For the first offense, be guilty of a violation punishable by a fine of
seven hundred fifty dollars ($750); and
2. For each subsequent offense, be guilty of a violation punishable by a
fine of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).
(b) The retailer and the common or private carrier shall not be liable for a
Page 2 of 3
BR184100.100 - 1841 - XXXX 1/23/2026 10:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1841
violation of this subsection.
(7) If a common or private carrier is unable to complete delivery under this section,
the hemp-derived vapor products shall be returned to the retailer.
Page 3 of 3
BR184100.100 - 1841 - XXXX 1/23/2026 10:53 AM Jacketed